Massachusetts, session 194th, H2447.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Subsection (d) of section 23 of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “days” in line 19, the 
following words:-; and provided, further, that a prescription for medically necessary testosterone 
therapy medication may be filled for up to a 90-day supply upon a single filling, and medical 
necessity shall be determined by the treating clinician in consultation with the patient and  
specifically noted with the written prescription and in the patient’s medical record.